Hawaii statutes.
[§173A-1] Purpose. The State has
provided for the regulation of land use and development throughout the State
under the provisions of the land use law, and has provided through that law for
the controlled regulation of land use and development of lands which have
natural, environmental, recreational, scenic or historic value. However, these
lands, though protected by the land use law, may in many instances require
placement under public ownership and management in order that they can be made
accessible to all of the people of the State. The purpose of this chapter is
to provide for the acquisition and management of such lands in those instances
in which such acquisition and management are considered necessary by the State.
[L 1973, c 77, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next